Nebraska, session 109, LB73.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB73 LB73
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-1414.07, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-1414.07 (1)(a) In order to maintain his or her professional
status and serve the law enforcement profession, the community, and the
residents of Nebraska, each law enforcement officer, other than a
noncertified conditional officer, shall attend continuing education
courses for the number of hours required in subdivision (1)(b) of this
section in the areas of criminal justice and law enforcement during each
calendar year beginning on January 1 and ending on December 31. A law
enforcement officer is not required to meet the continuing education
requirements in the year in which he or she first becomes fully
certified. A law enforcement officer may retire from service in good
standing without meeting the continuing education requirements in the
calendar year of the officer's retirement.
(b) The number of continuing education hours required under this
subsection shall be the greater of:
(i) Until January 1, 2022, twenty hours;
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2022, and until January 1, 2023, twenty-
eight hours; and
(i) For a law enforcement officer serving in a county with a
population of forty thousand or more inhabitants as determined by the
most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified
count by the United States Bureau of the Census, (iii) Beginning January
1, 2023, thirty-two hours; or .
(ii) For a law enforcement officer serving in a county with a
population of less than forty thousand inhabitants as determined by the
most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified
count by the United States Bureau of the Census, twenty hours.
(c) For a law enforcement officer who is not employed but who wishes
to maintain such officer's professional status, the officer shall be
considered to serve in the county of the officer's residence for purposes
-2-

LB73 LB73
2025 2025
of subdivision (1)(b) of this section.
(2) The annual continuing education required by this section shall
include:
(a) Refresher courses on de-escalation, mental health, and substance
abuse issues;
(b) A minimum of two hours of anti-bias and implicit bias training;
(c) Firearms;
(d) Officer wellness;
(e) Legal updates, including, but not limited to, legislative
changes and First Amendment and Fourth Amendment issues;
(f) Vehicular pursuit policy review; and
(g) Any other training as determined by a law enforcement agency.
(3) Continuing education courses may be offered in the form of
seminars, advanced education which may include college or university
classes, conferences, instruction conducted within the law enforcement
officer's law enforcement agency, or instruction conducted over the
Internet. Continuing education shall be of a type which has application
to and seeks to maintain and improve the skills of the law enforcement
officer in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 81-1414.07, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-